en: Original Lithuanian vodka
lt: Originali lietuviška degtinė

en: Polish vodkas
bg: Полска водка
de: Polnische Wodkas
fi: Puolalaiset votkat
fr: Vodkas polonaises
hr: Poljske votke
hu: Lengyel vodka
it: Vodka polacche
lt: Lenkiška degtinė
nl: Poolse wodkas, Poolse wodka
pl: Polskie wódki

en: Herbal vodka from the North Podlasie Lowland aromatised with an extract of bison grass
pl: Żubrówka, Wódka ziołowa z Niziny Północnopodlaskiej aromatyzowana ekstraktem z trawy żubrowej

en: Russian vodkas
bg: Руска водка
de: Russische Wodkas
fi: Venäläiset votkat
fr: Vodkas russes
hr: Ruske votke
hu: Orosz vodka
lt: Rusiška degtinė
nl: Russische wodkas, Russiche wodka
pl: Rosyjska wódka
ro: Vodcă rusească, Vodcă Rusia, Vodca ruseasca, Vodka ruseasca, vodka Rusia
ru: Русская водка
zh: 俄罗斯伏特加, 俄罗斯伏特加酒

en: Ukrainian vodkas
bg: Украинска водка
de: Ukraninische Wodkas
fi: Ukrainalaiset votkat
fr: Vodkas ukrainiennes
hr: Ukrajinske votke
hu: Ukrán vodka
lt: Ukrainietiška degtinė
nl: Ukraïnse wodkas
pl: Ukraińska wódka

en: Estonian vodkas
bg: Естонска водка
de: Estonische Wodkas
es: Vodkas estonias
fr: Vodkas estoniennes
hr: Estonske votke
it: Vodka estone
lt: Estų degtinės
nl: Estse wodkas

en: Latvian vodkas
bg: Латвийска водка
de: Lettischer Wodkas, Lettischer Wodka
es: Vodkas letones
fr: Vodkas lettones
hr: Latvijske votke
it: Vodka lettone
lt: Latviška degtinė
nl: Letse wodkas
pl: Łotewska wódka
ru: Латвийская водка

en: Vodka from Norway, Norwegian Vodka
da: Norsk Vodka, Norwegian Vodka
de: Norwegische Vodka, Norwegian Vodka
es: Vodka noruego, Norwegian Vodka
fi: Norjalainen Vodka, Norwegian Vodka
fr: Vodka norvégienne, Norwegian Vodka
hr: Vodka iz Norveške
hu: Norvég vodka
it: Vodka norvegese, Norwegian Vodka
nl: Noorse Vodka, Norwegian Vodka
no: Norsk Vodka, Norwegian Vodka
pl: Norweska wódka, Norwegian Vodka
ru: Норвежская водка, Norwegian Vodka
sv: Norsk Vodka, Norwegian Vodka
zh: 挪威伏特加, Norwegian Vodka

en: Czech vodkas
bg: Чешка водка
de: Tschechische Wodkas
es: Vodkas checos
fr: Vodkas tchèques
hr: Češke votke
hu: Cseh vodka
it: Vodka ceca
lt: Čekų degtinės
nl: Tsjechische wodkas
pl: Czeska wódka
ru: Чешская водка

fi: Suomalainen Vodka, Finsk Vodka, Vodka of Finland
hu: Finn vodka

en: Gins, Gin
bg: Джин
de: Gins
es: Ginebras
fi: Ginit, Gini
fr: Gins, Gin
hr: Ginovi
hu: Ginek, Gin
it: Gin
ja: ジン
lt: Džinas, Džinai
nl: Gins
pl: Gin, Dżin
ro: Gin

en: Spritz cocktails
fr: Cocktails spritz

en: Whiskey-based cocktail
de: Whisky-basierter Cocktail
es: Cóctel a base de whisky
fr: Cocktail à base de whisky
hr: Koktel na bazi viskija
nl: Whiskycocktail

en: Wine-based drinks
de: Weinbasierte Getränke, Getränke auf Weinbasis
es: Bebidas a base de vino
fi: Viinipohjaiset juomat
fr: Boissons à base de vin
hr: Pića na bazi vina
hu: Boralapú italok
nl: Dranken op basis van wijn

en: Vermouth
bg: Вермут
es: Vermut, Vermú
fr: Vermouth
hr: Vermut
hu: Vermut
pl: Wermut, Vermouth

en: Red Vermouth
fr: Vermouth rouge

en: White Vermouth
fr: Vermouth blanc

en: Wine-based aperitif, Fortified wine-based aperitif
fr: Apéritif anisé sans alcool

en: Ciders
de: Apfelweine, Apfelwein, Apfelmoste, Apfelmost, Moste, Most, Cidres
es: Sidras
fi: siiderit
fr: Cidres, jus de pommes fermenté, Boisson fermentée à base de pommes
hr: Jabukovače
hu: Almaborok, Almabor, Cider
it: Sidri
ja: シードル, リンゴ酒
lt: Sidrai, Sidras
nl: Ciders
pl: Cydr, Cydry
ro: Cidru

en: Artisanal ciders, artisanal cider
de: Craft Cider, Craft Apfelschaumwein, Cidre artisanal
fi: Artesaanisiiderit
fr: Cidres artisanaux, Cidre artisanal
hr: Obrtnički cideri
hu: Kézműves almaborok, Kézműves cider
it: Sidri artigianali, Sidro artigianale
nl: Ambachtelijke ciders